Tennessee, session 114, SB2133.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-14-217(b), is amended by
deleting the subsection and substituting:
(b) Except as provided in subsections (d) and (e), a person commits aggravated
cruelty to a livestock animal who, in a depraved and sadistic manner, intentionally:
(1) Starves the livestock animal to death without justifiable or lawful
purpose; or
(2) Engages in any of the conduct described in subdivisions (c)(1)-(12),
the conduct results in serious bodily injury to the animal or the death of the
animal, and is without justifiable or lawful purpose.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2133
011103
- 1 -